Illinois, session 104th, HB4052.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-2 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 9-2)7    Sec. 9-2. Political committee designations. 8    (a) Every political committee shall be designated as a (i) 9candidate political committee, (ii) political party committee, 10(iii) political action committee, (iv) ballot initiative 11committee, or (v) independent expenditure committee.12    (b) Beginning January 1, 2011, no public official or 13candidate for public office may maintain or establish more 14than one candidate political committee for each office that 15public official or candidate holds or is seeking. The name of 16each candidate political committee shall identify the name of 17the public official or candidate supported by the candidate 18political committee. If a candidate establishes separate 19candidate political committees for each public office, the 20name of each candidate political committee shall also include 21the public office to which the candidate seeks nomination for 22election, election, or retention. If a candidate establishes 23one candidate political committee for multiple offices elected   HB4052- 2 -LRB104 13552 SPS 26060 b1at different elections, then the candidate shall designate an 2election cycle, as defined in Section 9-1.9, for purposes of 3contribution limitations and reporting requirements set forth 4in this Article. No political committee, other than a 5candidate political committee, may include the name of a 6candidate in its name.7    (c) Beginning January 1, 2011, no State central committee 8of a political party, county central committee of a political 9party, committee formed by a ward or township committeeperson, 10or committee established for the purpose of electing 11candidates to the General Assembly may maintain or establish 12more than one political party committee. The name of the 13committee must include the name of the political party.14    (d) Beginning January 1, 2011, no natural person, trust, 15partnership, committee, association, corporation, or other 16organization or group of persons forming a political action 17committee shall maintain or establish more than one political 18action committee. The name of a political action committee 19must include the name of the entity forming the committee. 20This subsection does not apply to independent expenditure 21committees.22    (e) Beginning January 1, 2011, the name of a ballot 23initiative committee must include words describing the 24question of public policy and whether the group supports or 25opposes the question.26    (e-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory   HB4052- 3 -LRB104 13552 SPS 26060 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly, the political committee 2shall not bear the same name as, nor include the name of any 3established political committee.4    (f) Every political committee shall designate a chair and 5a treasurer. The same person may serve as both chair and 6treasurer of any political committee. A candidate who 7administers his own campaign contributions and expenditures 8shall be deemed a political committee for purposes of this 9Article and shall designate himself as chair, treasurer, or 10both chair and treasurer of such political committee. The 11treasurer of a political committee shall be responsible for 12keeping the records and filing the statements and reports 13required by this Article.14    (g) No contribution and no expenditure shall be accepted 15or made by or on behalf of a political committee at a time when 16there is a vacancy in the office of chair or treasurer thereof. 17No expenditure shall be made for or on behalf of a political 18committee without the authorization of its chair or treasurer, 19or their designated agents.20    (h) For purposes of implementing the changes made by this 21amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, every political 22committee in existence on the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall make the 24designation required by this Section by December 31, 2010.25(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB4052- 4 -LRB104 13552 SPS 26060 b1becoming law.